test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-2-nitonawîw_gt-norm.yaml
      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: nika-nitonâkothiwa # another/others will seek me, another/others will look for me, another/others will search for me
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kika-nitonâkothiwa # another/others will seek you, another/others will look for you, another/others will search for you
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [ka-nitonâkow, ka-nitonâk] # another/others will seek him/her, another/others will look for him/her, another/others will search for him/her
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: nika-nitonâkonâna # another/others will seek us, another/others will look for us, another/others will search for us
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kika-nitonâkonawa # another/others will seek you and us, another/others will look for you and us, another/others will search for you and us
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kika-nitonâkowâwa # another/others will seek you all, another/others will look for you all, another/others will search for you all
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [ka-nitonâkowak, ka-nitonâkwak] # another/others will seek them, another/others will look for them, another/others will search for them
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: ka-nitonawîthiwa # another/others will seek yet another/others, another/others will look for yet another/others, another/others will search for yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-nitonâkothiwa # yet another/others will seek another/others, yet another/others will look for another/others, yet another/others will search for another/others

      # X
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1SgO: nika-nitonâkawin # someone will seek me, someone will look for me, someone will search for me
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2SgO: kika-nitonâkawin # someone will seek you, someone will look for you, someone will search for you
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3SgO: ka-nitonawâw # someone will seek him/her, someone will look for him/her, someone will search for him/her
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1PlO: nika-nitonâkawinân # someone will seek us, someone will look for us, someone will search for us
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+X+12PlO: [kika-nitonâkawinaw, kika-nitonâkawinânaw] # someone will seek you and us, someone will look for you and us, someone will search for you and us
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2PlO: kika-nitonâkawinâwâw # someone will seek you all, someone will look for you all, someone will search for you all
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3PlO: ka-nitonawâwak # someone will seek them, someone will look for them, someone will search for them
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+X+4Sg/PlO: ka-nitonawâthiwa # someone will seek another/others, someone will look for another/others, someone will search for another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: nika-nitonâkon
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: kika-nitonâkon
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: ka-nitonâkow
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: nika-nitonâkonân
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: kika-nitonâkonaw
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: kika-nitonâkowâw
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: ka-nitonâkowak
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-nitonâkothiwa
      

      # Inf # PV/ka

      # 1Sg
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: ka-nitonâtân # I will seek you, I will look for you, I will search for you
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: ka-nitonawak # I will seek him/her, I will look for him/her, I will search for him/her
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: ka-nitonâtakwâw # I will seek you all, I will look for you all, I will search for you all
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: ka-nitonawakwâw # I will seek them, I will look for them, I will search for them
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO+Var/East: ka-nitonawaki # I will seek them, I will look for them, I will search for them
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: ka-nitonâmak # I will seek another/others, I will look for another/others, I will search for another/others

      # 2Sg
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ka-nitonawiyan # you will seek me, you will look for me, you will search for me
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: ka-nitonawat # you will seek him/her, you will look for him/her, you will search for him/her
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ka-nitonawiyâhk # you will seek us, you will look for us, you will search for us
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ka-nitonawacik # you will seek them, you will look for them, you will search for them
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ka-nitonâmat # you will seek another/others, you will look for another/others, you will search for another/others

      # 3Sg
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: ka-nitonawiyan # you will seek me, you will look for me, you will search for me
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: ka-nitonâsk # he/she will seek you, he/she will look for you, he/she will search for you
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: ka-nitonawiyâhk # you will seek us, you will look for us, you will search for us
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: ka-nitonâkoyâhk # you will seek us, you will look for us, you will search for us
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East: ka-nitonawiyamiht # you will seek us, you will look for us, you will search for us
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: ka-nitonâkoyahk # he/she will seek you and us, he/she will look for you and us, he/she will search for you and us
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East: ka-nitonâtahk # he/she will seek you and us, he/she will look for you and us, he/she will search for you and us
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: ka-nitonâkoyîk # he/she will seek you all, he/she will look for you all, he/she will search for you all
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East: ka-nitonâtîk # he/she will seek you all, he/she will look for you all, he/she will search for you all
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: ka-nitonawacik # you will seek them, you will look for them, you will search for them
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ka-nitonâmat # you will seek another/others, you will look for another/others, you will search for another/others
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: ka-nitonâmât # he/she will seek yet another/others, he/she will look for yet another/others, he/she will search for yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: ka-nitonâtâhk # we will seek you, we will look for you, we will search for you
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: ka-nitonawâyâhk # we will seek him/her, we will look for him/her, we will search for him/her
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East: ka-nitonawakiht # we will seek him/her, we will look for him/her, we will search for him/her
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: ka-nitonâtâhk # we will seek you all, we will look for you all, we will search for you all
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: ka-nitonawâyâhkwâw # we will seek them, we will look for them, we will search for them
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East: ka-nitonawakihcik # we will seek them, we will look for them, we will search for them
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-nitonâmâyâhk # we will seek another/others, we will look for another/others, we will search for another/others

      # 12Pl
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: ka-nitonawâyahk # we and you will seek him/her, we and you will look for him/her, we and you will search for him/her
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO+Var/East: ka-nitonawahk # we and you will seek him/her, we and you will look for him/her, we and you will search for him/her
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: ka-nitonawâyahkwâw # we and you will seek them, we and you will look for them, we and you will search for them
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: ka-nitonawahkwâw # we and you will seek them, we and you will look for them, we and you will search for them
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-nitonâmâyahk # we and you will seek another/others, we and you will look for another/others, we and you will search for another/others

      # 2Pl
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: ka-nitonawiyîk # you all will seek me, you all will look for me, you all will search for me
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: ka-nitonawâyîk # you all will seek him/her, you all will look for him/her, you all will search for him/her
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: ka-nitonawiyâhk # you all will seek us, you all will look for us, you all will search for us
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: ka-nitonawâyîkwâw # you all will seek them, you all will look for them, you all will search for them
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East: ka-nitonawâyîkok # you all will seek them, you all will look for them, you all will search for them
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-nitonâmâyîk # you all will seek another/others, you all will look for another/others, you all will search for another/others

      # 3Pl
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: [ka-nitonawitwâw, ka-nitonawicik] # they will seek me, they will look for me, they will search for me
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: ka-nitonâskwâw # they will seek you, they will look for you, they will search for you
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: ka-nitonâkoyâhkwâw # they will seek us, they will look for us, they will search for us
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO+Var/East: ka-nitonawiyamihcik # they will seek us, they will look for us, they will search for us
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: ka-nitonâkoyahkwâw # they will seek you and us, they will look for you and us, they will search for you and us
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO+Var/East: ka-nitonâtahkwâw # they will seek you and us, they will look for you and us, they will search for you and us
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: ka-nitonâkoyîkwâw # they will seek you all, they will look for you all, they will search for you all
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO+Var/East: ka-nitonâtîkwâw # they will seek you all, they will look for you all, they will search for you all
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: ka-nitonawâcik # they will seek another/others, they will look for another/others, they will search for another/others
      PV/ka+nitonawîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: ka-nitonâmâcik # they will seek yet another/others, they will look for yet another/others, they will search for yet another/others
